src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ÅERUVE
               +N+Sg:               ÅERUVE_SG      ;
               +N+Pl:               ÅERUVE_PL      ;
                  +N:               ÅERUVE_ESS     ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:uve%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:uve%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:uv%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»ievadtj      GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: åeruve # Odd-syllable test
!!€ åeruve:              åeruve+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ åeruven:             åeruve+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ åeruvem:             åeruve+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ åerievasse:          åeruve+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ åerievisnie:         åeruve+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ åerievistie:         åeruve+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ åerievinie:          åeruve+N+Sg+Com
!!€ åeruvh:              åeruve+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ åerievidie:          åeruve+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ åeruvi:              åeruve+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ åerievidie:          åeruve+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ åerievinie:          åeruve+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ åerievijstie:        åeruve+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ åeruvigujmie:        åeruve+N+Pl+Com
!!€ åerievinie:          åeruve+N+Ess
!!€ åerievadtje:         åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ åerievadtjen:        åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ åerievadtjem:        åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ åerievadtjese:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ åerievadtjesne:      åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ åerievadtjeste:      åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ åerievadtjine:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com
!!€ åerievadtjine:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess
!!€ åerievadtjh:         åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ åerievadtji:         åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ åerievadtjide:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ åerievadtjide:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ åerievadtjine:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ åerievadtjijste:     åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ åerievadtjigujmie:   åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com
!!€ åerievadtjine:       åeruve+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess


LEXICON ÅERUVE_SG
       +Nom:uve%^DISIMP    FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:uve%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:uve%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:iev%>asse      FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
       +Ine:iev%>isnie     FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:iev%>istie     FINAL1 ;
       +Com:iev%>inie      FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:iev%>amme      FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:iev%>adth      FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:iev%>amth      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:iev%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:iev%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:iev%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Ill+PxSg2:iev%>assedh    FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:iev%>æjnedh    FINAL1 ;


LEXICON ÅERUVE_PL
         +Nom:uv%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:iev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:uv%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:iev%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:iev%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:iev%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
         +Com:uv%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:uv%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ÅERUVE_ESS
 +Ess:iev%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUVE
               +N+Sg:               BÅERUVE_SG     ;
               +N+Pl:               BÅERUVE_PL     ;
                  +N:               BÅERUVE_ESS    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:uve%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:uve%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:uv%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»uvadtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON BÅERUVE_SG
       +Nom:uve%^DISIMP    FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:uv%>amme       FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:uv%>adth       FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:uve%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:uv%>amth       FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:uve%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:uv%>anne       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:uv%>anne       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:uv%>anne       FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:uv%>asse       FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Ill+PxSg2:uv%>assedh     FINAL1 ;
       +Ine:uv%>isnie      FINAL1 ;
       +Ine+Err/Orth:uvesne FINAL1 ;  !missing list
       +Ela:uv%>istie      FINAL1 ;
       +Ela+Err/Orth:uveste FINAL1 ; 
       +Com:uv%>inie       FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:uv%>æjnedh     FINAL1 ;


LEXICON BÅERUVE_PL
         +Nom:uv%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:uv%>idie             FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:uv%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:uv%>idie             FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:uv%>inie             FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:uv%>ijstie           FINAL1 ;
         +Com:uve%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:uve%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUVE_ESS
 +Ess:uv%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VUANOVE
               +N+Sg:               VUANOVE_SG     ;
               +N+Pl:               VUANOVE_PL     ;
                  +N:               VUANOVE_ESS    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:uve%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:uve%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:uv%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»avadtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

LEXICON VUANOVE_SG
       +Nom:ove%^DISIMP    FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:av%>amme       FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:av%>adth       FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:ove%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:av%>amth       FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:ove%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:av%>anne       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:av%>anne       FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:av%>anne       FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:av%>asse       FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
 +Ill+PxSg2:av%>assedh     FINAL1 ;
       +Ine:av%>isnie      FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:av%>istie      FINAL1 ;
       +Com:av%>inie       FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:av%>æjnedh     FINAL1 ;


LEXICON VUANOVE_PL
         +Nom:ov%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:av%>idie             FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:ov%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:av%>idie             FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:av%>inie             FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:av%>ijstie           FINAL1 ;
         +Com:ove%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:ove%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON VUANOVE_ESS
 +Ess:av%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUJE
               +N+Sg:               BÅERUJE_SG     ;
               +N+Pl:               BÅERUJE_PL     ;
                  +N:               BÅERUJE_ESS    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:uje%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:uje%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:uj%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»iejadtj      GIERIEHTSADTJE ;


LEXICON BÅERUJE_SG
       +Nom:uje%^DISIMP    FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:uje%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:uje%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:iej%>asse      FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
       +Ine:iej%>isnie     FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:iej%>istie     FINAL1 ;
       +Com:iej%>inie      FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:iej%>amme      FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:iej%>adth      FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:iej%>amth      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:iej%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:iej%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:iej%>anne      FINAL1 ;
 +Ill+PxSg2:iej%>assedh    FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:iej%>æjnedh    FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUJE_PL
         +Nom:uj%>%^DISIMPh        FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:iej%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:uj%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:iej%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:iej%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:iej%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
         +Com:uje%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:uje%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON BÅERUJE_ESS
 +Ess:iej%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON PL_RESIPROK
         +N+Pl+Nom:tj%>%^DISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
         +N+Pl+Acc:tj%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +N+Pl+Gen:tj%>%^DISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
         +N+Pl+Ill:tj%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +N+Pl+Ine:tj%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +N+Pl+Ela:tj%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
        +N+Pl+Com:tje%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:tje%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

!LEXICON ÅÅHPETJH_ESS
! +N+Ess:tj%>inie FINAL1 ;
! Maja Háliidá sierra leksikona Resiprok-pron:ii. ja bidjat tagga, mii čájeha dan. 
